California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) The on-sale retail licensed premises is a historic theater that is located in the City and County of San Francisco, that was built prior to 1927, and that is either within a historic district as designated by the National Register of Historic Places or is designated as a Landmark by the San Francisco Historic Preservation Commission.

(4) All payments for the purchase of advertising space and time shall be made pursuant to a written contract with the owner of the theater, the licensee, or the long-term tenant, as appropriate.

(5) No agreement for advertising authorized by this section shall be contingent upon or otherwise require, directly or indirectly, implicitly or explicitly, the retail licensee to purchase or sell any
 alcoholic beverages or other products produced, manufactured, imported, distributed, or otherwise represented by the purchaser of the advertising space and time. The special on-sale general licensee shall offer for sale, in a bona fide manner, alcoholic beverages manufactured, produced, or distributed by competing licensed beer manufacturers, winegrowers, rectifiers, distilled spirits manufacturers, craft distillers, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agents.

(6) Advertising space and time purchased pursuant to this section may be included in printed programs for specific theatrical performances and in announcements made during the theatrical performances, as well as any internet, social media, or other media promotion of the specific theatrical performance. The advertising may also be placed on or in the special on-sale general licensed premises.

(b) The Legislature finds that
 it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 271, Sec. 1.   (AB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.36.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an authorized licensee may sponsor events promoted by, and may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, a live entertainment marketing company in connection with events organized and conducted by the live entertainment marketing company on the premises of a permanent retail licensee
 located at the San Diego County Fairgrounds, located in the City of Del Mar in the County of San Diego, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The live entertainment marketing company operates and promotes live artistic, musical, sports, or cultural entertainment events only.

(2) The events will
 take place over a period of no more than four consecutive days during which approximately 100 acts will perform before approximately 20,000 or more patrons. 

(3) The live entertainment marketing company is a Delaware limited liability company that is under common ownership, management, or control by a private equity firm that may also have common ownership, management, or control of a licensed California winery, provided the winery represents not more than 25 percent of the assets under common ownership, management, or control by the private equity firm or its subsidiaries, and the live
 entertainment marketing company exercises no control over the operations of the winery. Any authorized licensee sponsoring an event or purchasing advertising space or time, pursuant to this section, shall obtain written verification of compliance with this subdivision prior to such sponsorship or the purchase of advertising space or time.

(4) Any on-sale licensee operating at the San Diego County Fairgrounds shall serve other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine distributed by a competing wholesaler or manufacturer in addition to any brand
 manufactured, distributed, or owned by the authorized licensee sponsoring an event or purchasing advertising space or time pursuant to this section. 

(5) An agreement pursuant to this section shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or distributed by
 any authorized licensee sponsoring or purchasing advertising space or time pursuant to this section. 

(b) Any sponsorship of events or purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the authorized licensee and the live entertainment marketing company.

(c) Any authorized licensee who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision
 (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any on-sale retail licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit
 an authorized licensee to purchase advertising time or space pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) Nothing in this section shall authorize the purchasing of advertising space or time directly from, or on behalf of, any on-sale licensee except as expressly authorized by this section or any other provision of this division.

(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize an authorized licensee to furnish, give, or lend anything of value to an on-sale retail licensee described in subdivision (a) except as expressly authorized by this section or any other provision of this division.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions shall apply: 

(1) “Authorized licensee” means the following licensees: beer manufacturer, out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, winegrower, winegrower’s agent, importer, rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits rectifier general, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(2) Except for a licensee that holds only a beer and wine importer general license or a distilled spirits importer general license, “importer” does not include the holder of any importer license that does not also hold at least one other license specified as
 an authorized licensee.

(h) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be
 limited to its expressed terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 527, Sec. 1.   (AB 1320)   Effective October 6, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.37.

(a) Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance, transfer, or renewal of any retail on-sale license to any person with respect to premises that are an integral part of an interactive entertainment facility and are owned directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee, notwithstanding that a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license, or in the retail licensee, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The
 principal business conducted within the facility is providing interactive entertainment, not the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(2) Other than as permitted in Sections 23358 and 23360 with respect to wine and brandy, the retail licensee shall purchase no beer, wine, or distilled spirits for sale in this state other than from a wholesale licensee, and the retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state from any wholesale licensee that has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail licensee, or in the retail license.

(3) The retail licensee shall serve other brands of beer, wine, and distilled spirits in addition to the brands manufactured, produced, or distributed by any manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California
 winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler which has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail licensee, or in the retail license.

(4) No more than 15 percent of the retail licensee’s monetary expenditures for alcoholic beverages for sale on its licensed premises in a calendar year shall be for products manufactured, produced, or distributed by any manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler which has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail licensee, or in the retail license.

(b) For purposes of this section, “interactive entertainment facility” means premises which feature interactive computer and video
 entertainment attractions, themed merchandise, and food and beverages.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. Notwithstanding the foregoing, having considered the public welfare, the economic impact on the state, and the entirety of the circumstances involved, the Legislature further finds that the purpose and intent of the general prohibition against tied interests is not violated by granting the exception established by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 327, Sec. 17.   (SB 937)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.38.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer may sponsor or purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an off-sale retail licensee subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The off-sale retail licensee is an owner or coowner of a professional sports team.

(2) The professional sports team owned or coowned by the off-sale retail licensee is a tenant of, and plays its home games in, an arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 10,000 seats located in San Joaquin County.

(3) The advertising space or time is sponsored or purchased only in connection with the professional sports team’s events held on the premises of the arena.

(4) The owner or coowner of the professional sports team does not hold or have an interest in more than two off-sale retail licenses.

(b) Any sponsorship or purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, the off-sale retail licensee, and all other coowners, where applicable.

(c) Any beer manufacturer who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any off-sale retail licensee described in subdivision (a) who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer to sponsor or purchase advertising time or space pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) Nothing in this section shall authorize the purchasing of advertising space or time from, or on behalf of, any on-sale licensee that is the owner, manager, agent of the owner, assignee of the owner’s advertising rights, or a tenant of the arena described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize a beer manufacturer to furnish, give, or lend anything of value to an off-sale retail licensee described in subdivision (a) except as expressly authorized by this section or any other provision of this division.

(g) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or a holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license, selling beer only.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.39.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may sponsor events promoted by, and may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, a live entertainment marketing company subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The live entertainment marketing company is a wholly owned subsidiary of a live entertainment company that has its principal place of business in the County of Los Angeles, whose shares of stock are sold to the general public on a national stock exchange, and also owns subsidiaries that hold on-sale retail licenses.

(2) The sponsorship and the advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with the promotion of live artistic, musical, sports, or cultural entertainment events at entertainment facilities, auditoriums, or arenas that are designed and used for live artistic, musical, sports, or cultural entertainment events.

(3) (A) Any on-sale licensee operating at a venue where live artistic, musical, sports, or cultural entertainment events are performed pursuant to a sponsorship described in this section or where advertising is purchased as described in this section shall serve other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine in addition to any brand manufactured or distributed by the sponsoring or advertising beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(B) Any on-sale retail licensee owned by the live entertainment company described in paragraph (1) shall serve other brands of beer, distilled spirits, and wine in addition to any brand manufactured or distributed by the sponsoring or advertising beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(4) (A) Advertising space or time purchased pursuant to this section shall not be placed in any on-sale licensed premises where the on-sale retail licensee is owned by the live entertainment company, or any of its subsidiaries, described in paragraph (1).

(B) Sponsorship provided pursuant to this section shall not be allowed if the event or activity is held at or in any on-sale licensed premises where the on-sale retail licensee is owned by the live entertainment company, or any of its subsidiaries, described in paragraph (1).

(5) An agreement for the sponsorship of, or for the purchase of advertising space and time during, a live artistic, musical, sports, or cultural entertainment event shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly, in any way, on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or distributed by the advertising or sponsoring beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent by the live entertainment company described in paragraph (1) or by any on-sale retail licensee that is owned by the live entertainment company.

(b) Any sponsorship of events or purchase of advertising space or time conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent and the live entertainment marketing company.

(c) Any beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any on-sale retail licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to purchase advertising time or space pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or a holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize the purchasing of advertising space or time directly from, or on behalf of, any on-sale licensee.

(g) Nothing in this section shall authorize a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, winegrower’s agent, holder of an importer’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to furnish, give, or lend anything of value to an on-sale retail licensee described in subdivision (a) except as expressly authorized by this section or any other provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 349, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.41.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any person that both operates a winery in another state and produces distilled spirits in another state may hold an interest in no more than 12 brewpub-restaurant licenses, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The out-of-state distilling operations occur only on premises where the licensee also conducts brewpub-restaurant operations, and do not exceed 12,000 gallons of distilled spirits annually at any licensed location.

(2) The out-of-state winery operations occur only on premises where the licensee also conducts brewpub-restaurant operations.

(3) The distilled spirits and wine that are manufactured out of state by the licensee are not imported into or sold in this state. If the licensee imports beer into this state that is produced in its out-of-state brewpub, it shall do so only through a licensed beer and wine wholesaler.

(b) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its expressed terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.42.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, the holder of a winegrower’s license, a California winegrower’s agent, a holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may purchase indoor advertising space or time at a fully enclosed venue with box office sales and attendance by the public on a ticketed basis only, with a patronage capacity in excess of 2,000, but not more than 3,000, located in Los Angeles County within the area subject to the Los Angeles Sports and Entertainment District Specific Plan adopted by the City of Los Angeles pursuant to ordinance number 174225, as approved on September 6, 2001, where the owner of
 the venue is not the on-sale retail licensee. The purchase of the indoor advertising space or time shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The indoor advertising space or time is purchased only at the venue specified in this subdivision.

(2) The purchase of indoor advertising space or time shall be conducted pursuant to a written agreement entered into by the beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent and the owner of the venue described in this subdivision. A holder of a wholesale license shall not be a party to the written agreement or otherwise have any direct or indirect obligations
 under the agreement, including an obligation to share in the costs or contribute to the costs of the indoor advertising space or time purchased pursuant to this section.

(3) An agreement for the purchase of indoor advertising space or time pursuant to this section shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly, in any way, on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or distributed by the advertising beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent by any on-sale retail licensee.

(4) An on-sale licensee operating at a venue described in this subdivision where indoor advertising
 space or time is purchased shall serve other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brands manufactured or marketed by the advertising beer manufacturer, other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brands produced or marketed by the advertising winegrower or California winegrower’s agent, and other brands of distilled spirits distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brands manufactured or marketed by the advertising distilled spirits manufacturer, the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, or a holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license.

(5) No more than 15 percent of the retail licensee’s monetary expenditures for distilled spirits and wine for sale on its licensed premises in any calendar year shall be for products
 manufactured, produced, or distributed by the holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent that has purchased indoor advertising space.

(b) A beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by a fine equal to
 the greater of an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(c) An on-sale retail licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer
 manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent to purchase indoor advertising time or space pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by a fine equal to the greater of an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a holder of an out-of-state beer
 manufacturer’s certificate, or a holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(e) Nothing in this section shall authorize the purchasing of indoor advertising space or time pursuant to subdivision (a) by any beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, a California winegrower’s agent, a distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent directly or indirectly from any on-sale licensee.

(f) A venue owner that meets the description provided in subdivision (a) and that enters into a written agreement pursuant to this section shall obtain an annual certificate from the department. The director shall prepare, as part of the annual report required by Section 23055 for submission to the
 Legislature, a listing of the number of certifications made pursuant to this section or the absence of any certifications. Where there have been no certifications made pursuant to this section for two consecutive years, this information shall be included in the report.

(g) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation among manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to its express terms so as not to
 undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 327, Sec. 18.   (SB 937)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.45.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a licensed beer manufacturer or a holder of beer and wine importer’s general license, or any director, partner, officer, agent, or representative of that person, may instruct consumers at an on-sale retail licensed premises authorized to sell its product with the permission of the on-sale retail licensee. The instruction may include serving beer sold by the on-sale retail licensee to the consumer and providing information on the history, nature, values, and characteristics of the beer, and methods
 of presenting and serving the beer. Orders for the sale of beer may be accepted by the beer manufacturer conducting an instructional event if the sales transaction is completed at the beer manufacturer’s licensed premises.

(b) A person authorized by subdivision (a), in advance of an authorized instructional event, may list in an advertisement the name and address of the on-sale retail licensee, the names of the beers being featured at the instructional event, and the time, date, and location of, and other information about, the instructional event, subject to the following limitations:

(1) The advertisement does not also contain the retail price of the beers. 

(2) The listing of the retailer’s name and address is the only reference to the retailer in the advertisement and is relatively inconspicuous in relation to
 the advertisement as a whole. Pictures or illustrations of the retailer’s premises and laudatory references to the retailer in these advertisements are not hereby authorized. 

(c) An on-sale retail licensee’s advertisement of an authorized instructional event may include the name, address, and brand names of the person authorized by subdivision (a), however nothing in this section allows that person to share in the costs of the on-sale retail licensee’s advertisement.

(d) For purposes of this section, a licensed beer and wine wholesaler shall not be a representative of a beer manufacturer or a holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no alcoholic beverage may be given away in
 connection with the instructional event authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (AB 2134)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25504.

Any person violating any provision of Sections 25500 to 25503, inclusive, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and any holder of any retail on-sale or retail off-sale license who solicits any such violation or accepts or permits to be accepted on his behalf and with his consent any of the prohibited matters, articles, or acts is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The provisions of Sections 25500 to 25503, inclusive, do not apply to any equipment, fixtures, or supplies furnished, given, lent, or sold prior to June 13, 1935, so long as the equipment, fixtures, or supplies remain in the premises in which installed prior to that time, nor do they apply to carbonic acid gas or tapping accessories furnished to any one on-sale licensee to a limit of not exceeding a value of five dollars ($5) per tap in any one calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1149.)
-------------------------------------------

25504.5.

The provisions of Sections 25500 to 25503, inclusive, and of Section 25600 do not apply to the occasional inspection and cleaning by manufacturers and wholesalers of taps and tapping equipment installed in retail on-sale premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25505.

No on-sale licensee, or any officer, director, employee, or agent of that licensee, shall hold any ownership or interest, directly or indirectly, in any manufacturer’s, winegrower’s, rectifier’s, importer’s, or wholesaler’s license, the business conducted under that license, or the property used in the business.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the holding by one person of a wholesaler’s license and an on-sale license in a county with a population that does not exceed 15,000.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the financial or representative relationship between a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer,
 or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of that person, and, except as otherwise specified, a person holding only one of the following types of licenses:

(a) On-sale general license for a bona fide club.

(b) Club license (issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 23425) of Chapter 3 of this division).

(c) Veterans’ club license (issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 23450) of Chapter 3 of this division).

(d) On-sale license for boats, trains, sleeping cars or airplanes, except as provided in subdivision (e), where the alcoholic beverages produced or sold by that manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, bottler, importer, or wholesaler or any officer, director, or agent of that person are not sold, furnished or
 given, directly or indirectly to the on-sale licensee.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the leasing of property by an on-sale licensee to a manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, importer or wholesaler provided that the lease agreement is first approved by the department. The department shall approve the lease agreement unless it finds that the rent payable is not the fair rental value of the property or that the purpose of the lease is to violate any of the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the holding of any ownership or interest by an on-sale licensee, or any officer, director, employee, or agent of any on-sale licensee, in any winegrower’s license, which winegrower manufactures, produces, bottles, processes, imports, or sells wine only, or in the business conducted under any winegrower’s license, provided the on-sale licensee, or the officer, director, employee,
 or agent thereof does not sell pursuant to that on-sale license any wine manufactured, produced, processed, imported, or sold by the licensed winegrower for so long as the holding of the ownership or interest continues.

(e) Any and all of the licenses specifically enumerated, mentioned, or described in Section 25503.30, either singly or in combination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 296, Sec. 9.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25506.

Except as authorized by this division, no off-sale general licensee, or any officer, director, employee, or agent of such licensee, shall hold any ownership or interest, directly or indirectly, in the business, property, or license of any distilled spirits wholesaler, rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25507.

The provisions of Section 25506 do not prohibit a licensed wine grower or brandy manufacturer holding an off-sale general license permitted by Section 23362, or any officer, director, or employee of such licensee, from holding any ownership or interest in any distilled spirits manufacturer's, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent's, rectifier's, or distilled spirits wholesaler’s license, business, or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25508.

Any person who held an interest in, or was a member of, a cooperative wholesale grocery company on May 1, 1947, which cooperative holds a distilled spirits wholesaler’s license, may hold and renew his off-sale general license and may acquire an off-sale general license or licenses for bona fide retail grocery store or stores. Any person who is admitted to membership, or acquires an interest, in such a cooperative after May 1, 1947, may hold or acquire off-sale general licenses and shall operate a bona fide retail grocery store at each location at which he holds or acquires an off-sale general license. Any cooperative wholesale grocery company which held a distilled spirits wholesale license on May 1, 1937, may hold and renew the license, notwithstanding its members or some of them hold off-sale general licenses pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25509.

(a) A distilled spirits manufacturer, a brandy manufacturer, a beer manufacturer, a winegrower, a wine blender, a distilled spirits rectifier, a wine rectifier, a distilled spirits wholesaler, or a beer and wine wholesaler who sold and delivered beer, wine, or distilled spirits to a retailer and who did not receive payment for that beer, wine, or distilled spirits by the expiration of the 42nd day from date of delivery shall charge the retailer 1 percent of the unpaid balance for that beer, wine, and distilled spirits on the 43rd day from date of delivery and an additional 1 percent for each 30 days thereafter.

(b) A distilled spirits manufacturer, a brandy